Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,127
Improvements; protests by majority of abutting property owners; filing; time; effect.

In any of the improvements or alterations authorized by sections 14-363, 14-364, 14-384 to 14-3,102, and 14-3,108 to 14-3,127 and subsection (1) of section 14-3,107 in which any of the cost of the improvements or alterations is to be assessed in whole or in part to the abutting property owners, the record owners of a majority of the frontage of the taxable abutting property may, by petition filed with the city within thirty days after notice of the improvements or alterations, protest against the improvements or alterations, and when such petition is filed, the improvements or alterations shall not be done.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 44, p. 210;

Laws 1965, c. 39, § 1, p. 232;

Laws 1969, c. 60, § 8, p. 369;

Laws 1991, LB 745, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 97, § 2.